Utah statutes.
17B-1-114.   Local district property taxes on a parity with general taxes.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by statute, property taxes levied by a local district shall constitute a lien on the property on a parity with and collectible at the same time and in the same manner as general county taxes that are a lien on the property.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

